Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-907
Hearing; duty of county board.

Final action shall not be taken on the proposed budget by the county board until after at least one public hearing has been held thereon by the board, as provided in sections 23-904 to 23-906. It shall be the duty of the county board to arrange for and hold such hearing. A copy of said budget document shall be available at the office of the clerk for public inspection from and after its transmission to the county board by the budget-making authority as provided in section 23-906.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 6, p. 226;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 4, p. 127;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2106;

R.S.1943, § 23-907.